New Mexico, session 2026, SB183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the health care authority for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to conduct a feasibility study on the creation of a regional urgent care or emergency room medical facility in Torrance county and surrounding jurisdictions. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233470.1